Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-1144
District No. 43, description.

District No. 43 shall contain the counties of Keya Paha, Boyd, Brown, Blaine, Loup, Rock, Thomas, Hooker, McPherson, Logan, and Custer, that part of Holt County not included in legislative district 40, and that part of Cherry County east of State Highway 61, excluding the village of Merriman.

Laws 1981, LB 406, § 44;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 5-244;

Laws 1991, LB 614, § 44;

Laws 2001, LB 852, § 44.